Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.15.040

Ballots—Election results.

Ballot titles shall be prepared by the city as provided in RCW 35A.29.120 and shall contain the words "For Dissolution" and "Against Dissolution", and shall contain on separate lines, alphabetically, the names of candidates for receiver. If a majority of the votes cast on the proposition are for dissolution, the municipal corporation shall be dissolved upon certification of the election results to the office of the secretary of state.

[ 1994 c 223 s 39; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.15.040.]